Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Purple Star Schools Act:

(1) Military-connected student means a student who:

(a) Is a dependent of a current or former member or reserve member serving in the Nebraska National Guard or the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or Space Force; or

(b) Was a dependent of a member or reserve member who served in the Nebraska National Guard or the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or Space Force who was killed in the line of duty during such service; and

(2) School means any public, private, denominational, or parochial school in this state.

Laws 2021, LB5, § 2.